Louisiana, session 2026, SB94.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 320(G) is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
Art. 320. Conditions of bail undertaking
* * *
G. Domestic offenses, stalking, and sex offenses, and human trafficking.
(1) In determining the conditions of release of a defendant who, the court
shall consider the previous criminal history of the defendant and whether the
defendant poses a threat or danger to the victim when the defendant is alleged
to have committed any of the following offenses:
(a) an An offense against the defendant's family or household member, as
defined in R.S. 46:2132, or against the defendant's dating partner, as defined in R.S.
46:2151, or who is alleged to have committed the offense of.
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-331 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 94
(b) domestic Domestic abuse battery under the provisions of R.S. 14:35.3,
or who is alleged to have committed the offense of.
(c) battery Battery of a dating partner under the provisions of R.S. 14:34.9,
or who is alleged to have committed the offense of.
(d) stalking Stalking under the provisions of R.S. 14:40.2, or who is alleged
to have committed the offense of.
(e) cyberstalking Cyberstalking under the provisions of R.S. 14:40.3, or who
is alleged to have committed the offense of.
(f) violation Violation of protective orders under the provisions of R.S.
14:79, or who is alleged to have committed the offense of.
(g) unlawful Unlawful communications under the provisions of R.S. 14:285,
or who is alleged to have committed a.
(h) sexual Sexual assault as defined in R.S. 46:2184, the court shall consider
the previous criminal history of the defendant and whether the defendant poses a
threat or danger to the victim.
(i) Human trafficking under the provisions of R.S. 14:46.2.
(j) Trafficking of children for sexual purposes under R.S. 14:46.3.
(2) If the court determines that the defendant poses such a threat or danger,
it shall require as a condition of bail that the defendant refrain from going to the
residence or household of the victim, the victim's school, and the victim's place of
employment or otherwise contacting the victim in any manner whatsoever, and shall
refrain from having any further contact with the victim.
(3) The court shall also require as a condition of bail that the defendant be
prohibited from communicating, by electronic communication, in writing, or orally,
with a victim of the offense or with any of the victim's immediate family members.
This condition shall not apply if the victim consents by way of a request to the court
and the court issues an order permitting the communication. If an immediate family
member of the victim consents by way of a request to the court and the court issues
an order permitting the communication, then the defendant may contact that person.
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-331 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 94
(4)(a) If the defendant is alleged to have committed the offense of human
trafficking under the provisions of R.S. 14:46.2 or trafficking of children for
sexual purposes under R.S. 14:46.3, the court shall require as a condition of bail
that the defendant refrain from engaging in employment that involves any of
the following:
(i) A transportation network company driver as provided in Part C of
Chapter 4 of Title 45 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(ii) Operation of any bus, taxicab, or limousine for hire as defined in R.S.
15:553.
(iii) A service worker who goes into a residence to provide any type of
service.
(iv) Operation of any carnival or amusement ride as defined in R.S.
15:553.
(v) A door-to-door solicitor, peddler, or itinerant vendor selling any type
of goods or services including magazines or periodicals or subscriptions to
magazines or periodicals.
(vi) Supervisory or disciplinary authority over children.
(vii) Operation or participation in the governance of any early learning
center as defined by R.S. 17:407.33, residential home as defined by R.S. 46:1403,
or residence in which child care services are provided by a family child care
provider or in-home provider who is registered pursuant to R.S. 17:407.61 et
seq.
(b) In determining the conditions of release and employment restrictions
of the defendant pursuant to Subsubparagraph (a) of this Subparagraph, the
court shall consider the previous criminal history of the defendant and whether
the defendant poses a threat or danger to the public.
(5) The court shall also consider any statistical evidence prepared by the
United States Department of Justice relative to the likelihood of such defendant or
any person in general who has raped or molested victims under the age of thirteen
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-331 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 94
years to commit sexual offenses against a victim under the age of thirteen in the
future.
(2)(6) If the defendant is alleged to have committed any of the offenses
included in Subparagraph (1) of this Paragraph and is denied bail or is unable to post
bail and is therefore incarcerated prior to trial, the court may issue an order under
this Paragraph prohibiting the defendant from communicating, by electronic
communication, in writing, or orally, with a victim of the offense, or with any of the
victim's immediate family members. This condition shall not apply if the victim
consents by way of a request to the court and the court issues an order permitting the
communication. If an immediate family member of the victim consents by way of
a request to the court and the court issues an order permitting the communication,
then the defendant may contact that person.
(3)(7) In all cases, the court shall issue and shall file into the record any order
issued pursuant to this Paragraph and shall serve the defendant with the order by
personal service. The court shall also comply with the provisions of Paragraph H of
this Article.
* * *